Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VIII. HAWAII PERFORMANCE

PARTNERSHIPS
BOARD]

[§27-51] Hawaii performance partnerships
board; establishment. (a) There is established within the office of the
governor, on a special and temporary basis, the Hawaii performance partnerships
board.

(b) The board shall consist of the following
nine members who shall be appointed by the governor in accordance with section
26-34:

(1) Three members representing business;

(2) Three members representing philanthropy; and

(3) Three members representing government.

(c) Members shall serve for five-year terms,
except for appointed state officials, who shall serve for the length of their
appointments.

(d) The members of the board shall serve
without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses, including travel
expenses.

(e) The governor shall designate a chairperson
from among the members of the board. [L 1999, c 160, §13]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next